Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1474
Aircraft; operation while under influence of liquor or drug; breath or chemical test; refusal; advised of consequences.

Any person who is required to submit to a preliminary breath test, or to a chemical blood or breath test pursuant to sections 28-1465 to 28-1474 shall be advised of the consequences of refusing to submit to such test.

Laws 1978, LB 903, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 773, § 6.